test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-peass_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - peäʹss u-stem # 'birch bark/ tuohi': # Noun - full paradigm
     peäʹss+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: peäʹss
     peäʹss+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: pieʹss
     peäʹss+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: pieʹss
     peäʹss+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: peässa
     peäʹss+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: pieʹssest
     peäʹss+N+Sg+Com+Indef: pieʹssin
     peäʹss+N+Ess+Indef: peäʹssen
     peäʹss+N+Par+Indef: peäʹssed
     peäʹss+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [pieʹsstaa, pieʹsstää]
     peäʹss+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: pieʹss
     peäʹss+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: pieʹssi
     peäʹss+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: pieʹssid
     peäʹss+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: pieʹssid
     peäʹss+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: pieʹssin
     peäʹss+N+Pl+Com+Indef: pieʹssivuiʹm
     peäʹss+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [pieʹssitaa, pieʹssitää]
